Louisiana, session 2026, HB821.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:1216 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1216. Louisiana Center for Safe Schools
A. The Louisiana Center for Safe Schools, referred to in this Section as the
"center", is hereby established within the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice.
B. The center shall administer school and nonprofit security programs
formerly provided pursuant to Title 29 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
C. The center shall do all of the following:
(1) Identify and prioritize resources available to improve the safety and
security of schools of this state and nonprofit organizations.
(2) Facilitate the collection and dissemination of information on safety
vulnerabilities, safety needs, training standards, best practices, and available funding
programs.
(3) Develop, in consultation with the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education, a comprehensive statewide school safety framework, including
behavioral threat assessment models and trauma-informed support practices.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 821 ENROLLED
(4) Assist schools in developing and revising crisis management and
emergency response plans required pursuant to R.S. 17:416.16.
(5) Coordinate with the state Department of Education and other appropriate
state agencies to ensure awareness of available safety resources and incorporation
of best practices.
(6) Provide training and technical assistance to schools, school governing
authorities, nonprofit organizations, and other appropriate entities on issues relating
to school and nonprofit security, including emergency operations planning,
emergency drills, threat assessment, facility security, digital safety, vulnerability
assessments, and hazard mitigation.
(7) Facilitate consistent and comprehensive information sharing between
schools, communities, nonprofit organizations, and governmental agencies to
promote safety and resiliency.
(8) Identify and offer training opportunities relating to school resource
officers and other personnel assigned to school and nonprofit security functions.
(9) Administer systems and coordinated processes relating to threat
assessment, violence prevention, risk mitigation, suicide prevention and intervention,
emergency preparedness, and response coordination.
D. The center may acquire, develop, license, hold, operate, maintain,
administer, and make available systems, platforms, tools, subscriptions, and related
infrastructure reasonably necessary to carry out its duties and may make such
systems available to authorized participants pursuant to agreements consistent with
applicable law.
E. The center may enter cooperative agreements, intergovernmental
agreements, cooperative endeavor agreements, contracts, or other lawful
arrangements with public entities or governmental bodies as necessary to carry out
its duties.
F. The center may apply for, receive, administer, and implement programs
supported by state, federal, interstate, or other lawful funding sources and may
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 821 ENROLLED
expend such funds and carry out programmatic requirements consistent with this
Section.
G. The center may utilize cooperative or intergovernmental contracts
authorized under state or federal law and existing statewide contracts to acquire
systems and services necessary to implement this Section. All procurements shall
be conducted in accordance with applicable state and federal procurement law.
H. The center shall adopt and maintain written policies governing data
management, confidentiality, access controls, authorized participation, and
compliance with applicable state and federal privacy law. Any public records
exemptions applicable to school security plans, critical incident data, or related
security information shall continue to apply to data and systems administered
pursuant to this Section.
I. The center may establish and administer emergency notification systems
and anonymous reporting systems to enhance school and nonprofit security.
J. The center shall provide an annual report to the governor, the State Board
of Elementary and Secondary Education, the House Committee on Education, the
Senate Education Committee, the House Committee on the Administration of
Criminal Justice, and the Senate Committee on Judiciary B regarding the status of
school and nonprofit security initiatives and the activities of the center.
K. Nothing in this Section shall supersede the constitutional authority of the
State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
L. The center shall coordinate with the Governor's Office of Homeland
Security and Emergency Preparedness, or its successor, regarding school-related
critical incident mapping and emergency response planning.
M.(1) There is hereby established within the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice the School and Nonprofit
Security Advisory Council, referred to in this Subsection as the "council".
(2) The council shall consist of the following members:
(a) The executive director of the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice, or his designee.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 821 ENROLLED
(b) The superintendent of the state Department of Education, or his designee.
(c) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health, or his designee.
(d) The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services, or his
designee.
(e) The superintendent of the Louisiana State Police, or his designee.
(f) The executive director of the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association, or his
designee.
(g) The executive director of a statewide association of chiefs of police, or
his designee.
(h) A representative of a statewide association of school boards, appointed
by that association.
(i) A representative of a statewide association of school principals or
superintendents, appointed by that association.
(j) The chair of the House Committee on Administration of Criminal Justice,
or his designee.
(k) The chair of the Senate Committee on Judiciary B, or his designee.
(l) The executive director of the Louisiana Interchurch Conference, or his
designee.
(m) The director of the Governor's Office of Homeland Security and
Emergency Preparedness, or his designee.
(3) The council shall elect a chair from among its members in accordance
with rules adopted by the council.
(4) A majority of the appointed members constitutes a quorum.
(5) The council shall meet at least quarterly and may meet more frequently
as determined by the council.
(6) The council shall do all of the following:
(a) Review and formally endorse statewide school and nonprofit security
frameworks developed by the center.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 821 ENROLLED
(b) Adopt formal recommendations regarding interagency coordination,
threat assessment standards, training alignment, emergency preparedness, and
programmatic implementation.
(c) Make formal recommendations regarding the establishment, design,
administration, and funding priorities of grant programs relating to school and
nonprofit security.
(d) Issue an annual report, no later than July first, to the governor and to the
legislature regarding school and nonprofit security initiatives and recommendations
of the council.
(7) The council shall not enter into contracts, expend funds, procure goods
or services, or promulgate administrative rules. Implementation authority shall
remain with the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of
Criminal Justice through the Louisiana Center for Safe Schools.
N.(1) The council established pursuant to this Section shall be the successor
entity to the Louisiana Commission on School and Nonprofit Security previously
created pursuant to R.S. 29:726.5.
(2) All powers, duties, functions, records, reports, recommendations, data
studies, pending matters, officers, and other actions of the prior commission are
transferred to and shall continue in effect under the council established by this
Section.
Section 2. R.S. 29:726.5, 726.5.1, and 726.6 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. Any member serving on the Louisiana Commission on School and
Nonprofit Security, whose position corresponds to a position on the School and Nonprofit
Security Advisory Council as created by this Act, shall continue to serve in the same
capacity on the newly created council on the effective date of this Act. All other positions
of the Louisiana Commission on School and Nonprofit Security shall be eliminated on the
effective date of this Act.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor, or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 821 ENROLLED
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.